Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Jury Fees

Cross references. —

For provision that jurors in all courts shall be allowed the same fees and mileage as jurors in district court, see §

1-11-119

.

For provision that no juror shall receive pay as a witness while serving as a juror, see §

1-14-103

.

For limitation on per diem compensation of jurors, see §

1-14-111

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Jury § 94.

50 C.J.S. Juries § 207.

§ 1-11-301.
Fees in district court generally.

All persons summoned
as jurors in the district courts of this state shall receive the fees
hereinafter provided and none other.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 37, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1206; R.S. 1899, § 3383; C.S. 1910, § 1018; C.S. 1920, § 1243; R.S. 1931, § 61-240; C.S. 1945, § 12-301; W.S. 1957, § 1-134; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to fees of jurors upon change of venue or judge, see §

1-7-101

.

§ 1-11-302.
Mileage rate.

Jurors shall receive mileage at the rate set in W.S.

9-3-103

when the distance required to be traveled by the juror from the juror’s place of residence to the place of trial exceeds five (5) miles one (1) way.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 37, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1207; R.S. 1899, § 3384; C.S. 1910, § 1019; C.S. 1920, § 1244; R.S. 1931, § 61-241; C.S. 1945, § 12-302; W.S. 1957, § 1-135; Laws 1965, ch. 71, § 1; 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
substituted "Jurors" for "For each mile actually and necessarily traveled in going to and returning from the place of trial they" and added "required to be", "by the juror from the juror's place of residence to the place of trial" and "one (1) way."

Law reviews. —

See case note, “Constitutional Law — An Indigent's Right to a Free Trial Transcript. Mayer v. City of Chicago, 404 U.S. 189, 30 L. Ed. 2d 372, 92 S. Ct. 410, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 298 (1971),” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1972).

§ 1-11-303.
Amount
of fees.

Jurors shall receive
thirty dollars ($30.00) for each full or part day of actual attendance.
A juror in attendance for more than five (5) consecutive days, exclusive
of Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, may, in the discretion of the
court, be allowed an additional twenty dollars ($20.00) per day for
each day actually in attendance.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 37, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1208; R.S. 1899, § 3385; C.S. 1910, § 1020; C.S. 1920, § 1245; Laws 1921, ch. 82, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 61-242; Laws 1937, ch. 43, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 12-303; W.S. 1957, § 1-136; Laws 1959, ch. 112, § 1; 1967, ch. 129, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 2009, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “Effective July 1, 1984,” preceding “jurors shall receive” in the first sentence.

Law reviews. —

See case note, “Constitutional Law — An Indigent's Right to a Free Trial Transcript. Mayer v. City of Chicago, 404 U.S. 189, 30 L. Ed. 2d 372, 92 S. Ct. 410, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 298 (1971),” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1972).

§ 1-11-304.
Certificate issued to jurors.

The clerk of the court
shall note the time of the discharge of each juror summoned and issue
to the juror a certificate under seal of the court for the amount
due him for mileage and juror fees.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 37, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1209; R.S. 1899, § 3386; C.S. 1910, § 1021; C.S. 1920, § 1246; R.S. 1931, § 61-243; C.S. 1945, § 12-304; W.S. 1957, § 1-137; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Certificates not order for payment. —

Certificates issued by clerk of the court which tried a criminal case on change of venue, reciting that a person named therein attended as a witness and is entitled to a certain sum payable by the county in which the indictment was found, is not an order upon said latter county for payment of said sum. Stoll v. Board of Comm'rs, 6 Wyo. 231, 44 P. 58,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1896).